Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1135.2, as
last amended by Section 80, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1135.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1135.2. A. Service Oklahoma is hereby authorized to
design and issue appropriate official special license plates to
persons in recognition of their service or awards as provided by
this section.

HB1598 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Special license plates shall not be transferred to any other
person but shall be removed from the vehicle upon transfer of
ownership and retained. The special license plate may then be used
on another vehicle but only after such other vehicle has been
registered for the current year.
Special license plates shall be renewed each year by Service
Oklahoma or a licensed operator. Service Oklahoma shall annually
notify all persons issued special license plates. Service Oklahoma
shall send the notifications to the electronic mail address provided
by the person. If a person does not provide an electronic mail
address, Service Oklahoma shall notify the person by mail. The
notice shall contain all necessary information and shall contain
instructions for the renewal procedure upon presentation to a
licensed operator or Service Oklahoma. The license plates shall be
issued on a staggered system except for legislative plates and
amateur radio operator license plates.
On and after January 1, 2022, if a special license plate is
issued pursuant to this section, any registration fee required for
such plate pursuant to this section and the fee required pursuant to
Section 1132 of this title shall be remitted at the same time and
subject to a single registration period. Service Oklahoma shall
determine, by rule, a method for making required fee and
registration period adjustments if a special license plate is
obtained during a twelve-month period for which a registration fee
HB1598 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

has already been remitted pursuant to Section 1132 of this title.
The combination of fees in a single remittance shall not alter the
apportionment otherwise provided for in this section.
Service Oklahoma is hereby directed to develop and implement a
system whereby licensed operators are permitted to accept
applications for special license plates authorized under this
section. The licensed operator shall confirm the applicant's
eligibility, if applicable, collect and deposit any amount
specifically authorized by law, accept and process the necessary
information directly into such system and generate a receipt
accordingly. For performance of these duties, licensed operators
shall retain the fee provided in Section 1141.1 of this title for
registration of a motor vehicle. The licensed operator fees for
acceptance of applications and renewals shall be paid out of the
Oklahoma Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund. Beginning January 1,
2023, the licensed operator fees for acceptance of applications and
renewals shall be paid out of the Service Oklahoma Reimbursement
Fund.
B. The special license plates provided by this section are as
follows:
1. Prisoner of War License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for honorably discharged or present members of the United
States Armed Forces and civilians who were former prisoners of war
held by a foreign country and who can provide proper certification
HB1598 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

of t hat status. Such persons may apply for a prisoner of war
license plate for no more than two vehicles with each vehicle having
a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less. The surviving
spouse of any deceased former prisoner of war, if the spouse has not
since remarried, or if remarried, the remarriage is terminated by
death, divorce, or annulment, may apply for a prisoner of war
license plate for one vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one
(1) ton or less. The fee provided by this section for the special
license plate authorized by this paragraph shall be in addition to
all other registration fees provided by law, except the registration
fees levied by Section 1132 of this title;
2. National Guard License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for active or retired members of the Oklahoma National
Guard. Retirees who are eligible for such plates shall provide
proof of eligibility upon initial application, but shall not be
required to provide proof of eligibility annually;
3. Air National Guard License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for active or retired members of the Oklahoma Air National
Guard. Retirees who are eligible for such plates shall provide
proof of eligibility upon initial application, but shall not be
required to provide proof of eligibility annually;
4. United States Armed Forces License Plates - such plates
shall be designed for active, retired, former or reserve members of
the United States Armed Forces, and shall identify which branch of
HB1598 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

serv ice, and carry the emblem and name of either the Army, Navy, Air
Force, Marines or Coast Guard, according to the branch of service to
which the member belongs or did belong. Former members who have
been dishonorably discharged shall not be eligible for such plates.
Persons applying for such license plate must show proof of present
or past military service by presenting a valid Uniformed Services
Identity Card or the United States Department of Defense form DD
214. Retired or former members who are eligible for such plates
shall provide proof of eligibility upon initial application, but
shall not be required to provide proof of eligibility annually;
5. Congressional Medal of Honor Recipient License Plates - such
plates shall be designed for any resident of this state who has been
awarded the Congressional Medal of Honor. Such persons may apply
for a Congressional Medal of Honor recipient license plate for each
vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less.
There shall be no registration fee for the issuance of this plate;
6. Missing In Action License Plates - such plates shall be
designed to honor members of the United States Armed Forces who are
missing in action. The spouse of such missing person, if the spouse
has not since remarried, or if remarried, the remarriage is
terminated by death, divorce, or annulment, and each parent of the
missing person may apply for a missing in action license plate upon
presenting proper certification that the person is missing in action
and that the person making the application is the qualifying spouse
HB1598 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

or t he parent of the missing person. The qualifying spouse and each
parent of the missing person may each apply for the missing in
action license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity
of one (1) ton or less;
7. Purple Heart Recipient License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for any resident of this state presenting proper
certification from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs
or the Armed Forces of the United States certifying that such
resident has been awarded the Purple Heart military decoration.
Such persons may apply for a Purple Heart recipient license plate
for vehicles having a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or
less. The surviving spouse of any deceased veteran who has been
awarded the Purple Heart military decoration, if such spouse has not
since remarried, or if remarried, the remarriage has been terminated
by death, divorce or annulment, may apply for such plate for one
vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less. The
license plate created by this paragraph shall be exempt from the fee
provided by this section for special license plates;
8. Pearl Harbor Survivor License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for any resident of this state who can be verified by the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the Armed Forces of
the United States as being:
a. a member of the United States Armed Forces on December
7, 1941,
HB1598 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

b. stationed on December 7, 1941, during the hours of
7:55 a.m. to 9:45 a.m. Hawaii time at Pearl Harbor,
the island of Oahu, or offshore at a distance not to
exceed three (3) miles, and
c. a recipient of an honorable discharge from the United
States Armed Forces.
Such person may apply for a Pearl Harbor Survivor license plate
for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or
less;
9. Iwo Jima License Plates - such plates shall be designed for
any resident of this state who can be verified by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs or the Armed Forces of the United
States as being:
a. a member of the United States Armed Forces in February
of 1945,
b. stationed in February of 1945 on or in the immediate
vicinity of the island of Iwo Jima, and
c. a recipient of an honorable discharge from the United
States Armed Forces.
Such person may apply for an Iwo Jima license plate for each
vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less.
Such license plate shall have the legend "Oklahoma OK" and shall
contain three letters and three numbers. Between the letters and
numbers shall be a logo of the flag-raising at Iwo Jima. Below the
HB1598 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

lett ers, logo and numbers, the plate shall contain the words "FEB."
at the left, "Iwo Jima" in the center and "1945" at the right. Such
plates shall not be subject to the design requirements of any other
license plates prescribed by law other than the space for the
placement of the yearly decals for each succeeding year of
registration after the initial issue;
10. D-Day Survivor License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for any resident of this state who can be verified by the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the Armed Forces of
the United States as being:
a. a member of the United States Armed Forces on June 6,
1944,
b. a participant in the Allied invasion of the coast of
Normandy on June 6, 1944; provided, if such
participation cannot be verified by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs or the Armed Forces of
the United States, the Tax Commission may, in its
discretion, accept evidence of such participation from
the person applying for the license plate, and
c. a recipient of an honorable discharge from the United
States Armed Forces.
Such person may apply for a D-Day Survivor license plate for
each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less;

HB1598 HFLR Page 8
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

11. Killed in Action License Plates - such plates shall be
designed to honor members of the United States Armed Forces who were
killed in action. The spouse of the deceased person, if the spouse
has not remarried, or if remarried, the remarriage is terminated by
death, divorce, or annulment, may apply for a killed in action
license plate upon presenting proper certification that the person
was killed in action and that the person making the application is
the qualifying spouse of the deceased person. The qualifying spouse
may apply for a killed in action license plate for no more than two
vehicles with each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1)
ton or less. The fee provided by this section for the special
license plate authorized by this paragraph shall be in addition to
all other registration fees provided by law, except the registration
fees levied by Section 1132 of this title. Beginning November 1,
2021, the killed in action license plate shall be designed to honor
members of the United States Armed Forces who were killed in action
while engaged in combat with a hostile force. The parents,
siblings, half-siblings, grandparents or spouse of the deceased
person, if the spouse has not remarried, or if remarried, the
remarriage is terminated by death, divorce or annulment, may apply
for a killed in action license plate upon presenting proper
certification that the person was killed in action and that the
person making the application is the qualifying spouse or family
member of the deceased person. The qualifying spouse or family
HB1598 HFLR Page 9
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

memb er may apply for a killed in action license plate for no more
than two vehicles with each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity
of one (1) ton or less. The license plate shall have a white
background and the legend "Killed in Action" and shall contain any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven in
black, as for personalized license plates. To the left of the
numbers and letters shall be the Battlefield Cross in gold. The
killed in action license plate shall be exempt from any minimum
issuance criteria related to license plate applications;
12. Gold Star Families License Plates - such plates shall be
designed to honor members of the United States Armed Forces who were
killed while on active duty. The parents, siblings, half-siblings
or grandparents of the deceased person may apply for a gold star
license plate upon presenting proper certification that the person
was killed while on active duty and that the person making the
application is the parent, sibling, half-sibling or grandparent of
the deceased person. The family member may apply for a gold star
families license plate for no more than two vehicles with each
vehicle having a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less.
The fee provided by this section for the special license plate
authorized by this paragraph shall be in addition to all other
registration fees provided by law, except the registration fees
levied by Section 1132 of this title;

HB1598 HFLR Page 10
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

13. Military Decoration License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for any resident of this state who has been awarded the
Distinguished Service Medal, the Distinguished Service Cross, the
Distinguished Flying Cross, the Bronze Star military decoration or
the Silver Star military decoration. Such persons may apply for a
military decoration license plate for each vehicle with a rated
carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less;
14. Vietnam Veteran License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for honorably discharged or present members of the United
States Armed Forces who served in the Vietnam Conflict. Such
persons may apply for a Vietnam veteran license plate for each
vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less;
15. Police Officer License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for any currently employed, reserve or retired municipal
police officer or full-time, reserve or retired university police
officer certified by the Council on Law Enforcement Education and
Training or common education police officer certified by the Council
on Law Enforcement Education and Training. Police officers may
apply for police officer license plates for vehicles with a rated
capacity of one (1) ton or less or for a motorcycle upon proof of
employment by or retirement from a municipal, university or common
education police department by either an identification card or
letter from the chief of the police department or the Oklahoma
Police Pension and Retirement Board. Retirees who are eligible for
HB1598 HFLR Page 11
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

such plates shall provide proof of eligibility upon initial
application but shall not be required to provide proof of
eligibility annually. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with municipal police departments of this state;
provided, the license plate for motorcycles may be of similar design
to the license plate for motor vehicles or may be a new design in
order to meet space requirements for a motorcycle license plate;
16. World War II Veteran License Plates - such plates shall be
designed to honor honorably discharged former members of the United
States Armed Forces who are residents of this state and who can be
verified by the Military Department of the State of Oklahoma, the
Department of Veterans Affairs or the Armed Forces of the United
States as having served on federal active duty anytime during the
period from September 16, 1940, to December 7, 1945. The former
members may apply for a World War II Veteran license plate for
vehicles with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less.
The license plate shall have the legend "Oklahoma" and shall
contain, in the center of the plate, either the Thunderbird Insignia
of the 45th Infantry Division in the prescribed red and gold
coloring or the emblem of the Army, Navy, U.S. Army Air Corps,
Marines or Coast Guard according to the branch of service to which
the member belonged. For the purpose of license plate
identification, the plate shall contain four digits, two digits at
the left and two digits at the right of the insignia or emblem.
HB1598 HFLR Page 12
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Cent ered on the bottom of the license plate shall be the words
"WORLD WAR II";
17. Korean War Veteran License Plates - such plates shall be
designed to honor honorably discharged former members of the United
States Armed Forces who are residents of this state and who can be
verified by the Military Department of the State of Oklahoma, the
Department of Veterans Affairs or the Armed Forces of the United
States as having served on federal active duty anytime during the
period from June 27, 1950, to January 31, 1955, both dates
inclusive. The former members may apply for a Korean War Veteran
license plate for vehicles with a rated carrying capacity of one (1)
ton or less.
The license plate shall have the legend "OKLAHOMA" and shall
contain, in the center of the plate, either the Thunderbird Insignia
of the 45th Infantry Division in the prescribed red and gold
coloring or the emblem of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marines or
Coast Guard according to the branch of service to which the member
belonged. For the purpose of license plate identification, the
plate shall contain four digits, two digits at the left and two
digits at the right of the insignia or emblem. Centered on the
bottom of the license plate shall be the word "KOREA";
18. Municipal Official License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for persons elected to a municipal office in this state and
shall designate the name of the municipality and the district or
HB1598 HFLR Page 13
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

ward in which the municipal official serves. The plates shall only
be produced upon application;
19. Red Cross Volunteer License Plates - such plates shall be
designed to honor American Red Cross volunteers and staff who are
residents of this state. Such persons must present an
identification card issued by the American Red Cross and bearing a
photograph of the person. The license plate shall be designed with
the assistance of the American Red Cross and shall have the legend
"Oklahoma OK!" in the color Pantone 186C Red. Below the legend the
symbol of the American Red Cross and no more than three letters and
three numbers shall be in the color Pantone 186C Red. Below the
symbol and letters and numbers shall be the words "American Red
Cross" in black. The plates shall not be subject to the design
requirements of any other license plates prescribed by law other
than the space for the placement of the yearly decals for each
succeeding year of registration after the initial issue;
20. Desert Storm License Plates - such plates shall be designed
and issued to any honorably discharged or present member of the
United States Armed Forces who served in the Persian Gulf Crisis and
the Desert Storm operation. Such persons may apply for a Desert
Storm license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity
of one (1) ton or less;
21. Military Reserve Unit License Plates - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any honorably discharged or present member of
HB1598 HFLR Page 14
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

a re serve unit of the United States Armed Forces. Such persons may
apply for a Military Reserve Unit license plate for each vehicle
with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less;
22. Oklahoma City Bombing Victims and Survivors License Plates
- such plates shall be designed and issued to any victim or survivor
of the bombing attack on the Alfred P. Murrah Federal Building in
downtown Oklahoma City on April 19, 1995;
23. Civil Air Patrol License Plates - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person who is a member of the Civil Air
Patrol. Such persons may apply for a Civil Air Patrol license plate
for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or
less upon proof of membership in the Civil Air Patrol. The license
plate shall be designed in consultation with the Civil Air Patrol;
24. Ninety-Nines License Plates - such plates shall be designed
and issued to members of the Ninety-Nines. Persons applying for
such license plate must show proof of membership in the Ninety-
Nines. The license plates shall be designed in consultation with
the Ninety-Nines;
25. Combat Infantryman Badge License Plates – such plates shall
be designed to honor recipients of the Combat Infantryman Badge.
The plate shall have the legend "Oklahoma OK". Below the legend
shall be the Combat Infantryman Badge and three numbers. Below the
badge and the numbers shall be the words "Combat Infantryman Badge".
Such persons may apply for a Combat Infantryman Badge license plate
HB1598 HFLR Page 15
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or
less;
26. Somalia Combat Veterans License Plates – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any honorably discharged or present member
of the United States Armed Forces who saw combat in the United
Nations relief effort. Such persons may apply for a Somalia Combat
Veteran license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less;
27. Police Chaplain License Plates – such plates shall be
designed and issued to members of the International Conference of
Police Chaplains (ICPC) who have completed the ICPC requirements for
basic certification as a police chaplain. The license plates shall
be designed in consultation with the ICPC;
28. Joint Service Commendation Medal License Plates – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any resident of this state
who has been awarded the Joint Service Commendation Medal by the
United States Secretary of Defense;
29. Merchant Marine License Plates - such plates shall be
designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma by
the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs, and issued to any
person who during combat was a member of the Merchant Marines as
certified by the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs. Such
license plate may be issued for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less;
HB1598 HFLR Page 16
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

30. Legislative License Plates - such plates shall be designed
for persons elected to the Oklahoma Legislature and shall designate
the house of the Legislature in which the legislator serves and the
district number;
31. Disabled Veterans License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for persons presenting proper certification from the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs or the Armed Forces of the
United States certifying such veteran has a service-connected
disability rating of fifty percent (50%) or more, regardless which
agency pays the disability benefits, or that such veteran has been
awarded a vehicle by the United States government or receives a
grant from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs for the
purchase of an automobile due to a service-connected disability
rating or due to the loss of use of a limb or an eye. Such persons
may apply to Service Oklahoma for a disabled veterans license plate
or to a licensed operator for a regular license plate for no more
than two four vehicles with each vehicle having a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less. The surviving spouse of any
deceased disabled veteran, if the spouse has not since remarried, or
if remarried, the remarriage is terminated by death, divorce, or
annulment, or a surviving spouse in receipt of Dependency and
Indemnity Compensation from the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs, may apply for a disabled veterans license plate for one
vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less. The
HB1598 HFLR Page 17
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

fee provided by this section for the special license plate
authorized by this paragraph shall be in addition to all other
registration fees provided by law, except the registration fees
levied by Section 1132 of this title. The total expense of this
license plate shall not exceed Five Dollars ($5.00).
If the person qualifies for a disabled veterans license plate
and is also eligible for a physically disabled placard under the
provisions of Section 15-112 of this title, the person shall be
eligible to receive a disabled veterans license plate that also
displays the international accessibility symbol, which is a stylized
human figure in a wheelchair. Upon the death of the disabled
veteran with a disabled veterans license plate with the
international accessibility symbol, the plate shall be returned to
Service Oklahoma;
32. United States Air Force Association License Plates - such
plates shall be designed for members of the United States Air Force
Association. Persons applying for such license plate must show
proof of membership in the Association. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Association;
33. Oklahoma Military Academy Alumni License Plates - such
plates shall be designed and issued to any resident of this state
who is an alumnus of the Oklahoma Military Academy. Such persons
may apply for an Oklahoma Military Academy Alumnus license plate for
each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less.
HB1598 HFLR Page 18
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

The license plates shall be designed in consultation with the
Oklahoma Military Academy and shall contain the shield of the
Academy;
34. Amateur Radio Operator License Plates – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person, holding a valid operator's
license, technician class or better, issued by the Federal
Communications Commission, and who is also the owner of a motor
vehicle currently registered in Oklahoma, in which has been
installed amateur mobile transmitting and receiving equipment.
Eligible persons shall be entitled to two special vehicle
identification plates as herein provided. Application for such
identification plates shall be on a form prescribed by Service
Oklahoma and the plates issued to such applicant shall have stamped
thereon the word "Oklahoma" and bear the official call letters of
the radio station assigned by the Federal Communications Commission
to the individual amateur operator thereof. All applications for
such plates must be made to Service Oklahoma on or before the first
day of October of any year for such plates for the following
calendar year and must be accompanied by the fee required in this
section together with a certificate, or such other evidence as
Service Oklahoma may require, of proof that applicant has a valid
technician class or better amateur operator's license and proof of
applicant's ownership of a vehicle in which radio receiving and
transmitting equipment is installed. Applicants shall only be
HB1598 HFLR Page 19
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

enti tled to one set of special identification plates in any one (1)
year, and such calendar year shall be stamped thereon. The right to
such special identification plates herein provided for shall
continue until the amateur radio operator's license of the person to
whom such plates are issued expires or is revoked;
35. American Legion License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for members of the American Legion. Persons applying for
such license plate must show proof of membership. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the American Legion of
Oklahoma;
36. Deputy Sheriff License Plates - such plates shall be
designed for any currently employed or retired county sheriff or
deputy sheriff. County sheriffs or deputy sheriffs may apply for
such plates for vehicles with a rated capacity of one (1) ton or
less upon proof of employment by or retirement from a county
sheriff's office by either an identification card or letter from the
county sheriff or a government-sponsored retirement board from which
the county sheriff or deputy sheriff may be receiving a pension.
Retirees who are eligible for such plates shall provide proof of
eligibility upon initial application but shall not be required to
provide proof of eligibility annually. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the county sheriff offices of this
state;

HB1598 HFLR Page 20
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

37. Gold Star Surviving Spouse License Plates – such plates
shall be designed to honor the surviving spouses and children of
qualified veterans. As used in this paragraph, "qualified veteran"
shall mean:
a. any person honorably discharged from any branch of the
United States Armed Forces or as a member of the
Oklahoma National Guard, who died as a direct result
of the performance of duties for any branch of the
United States Armed Forces or Oklahoma National Guard
while on active military duty, or
b. any person honorably discharged from any branch of the
United States Armed Forces or as a member of the
Oklahoma National Guard, who died as a result of
injury, illness or disease caused by the performance
of such duties while on active duty, whether the death
occurred while on active duty or after the honorable
discharge of such person.
The fee provided by this section for the special license plate
authorized by this paragraph shall be in addition to all other
registration fees provided by law, except the registration fees
levied by Section 1132 of this title;
38. Korea Defense Service Medal License Plates – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any resident of this state who has
been awarded the Korea Defense Service Medal by the United States
HB1598 HFLR Page 21
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Secr etary of Defense. Such persons may apply for a Korea Defense
Service Medal license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less;
39. 180th Infantry License Plates – such plates shall be
designed for members and prior members of the 180th Infantry.
Persons applying for such license plate must obtain and provide
proof of their membership from the 180th Infantry Association. The
license plates shall be designed in consultation with the 180th
Infantry;
40. Operation Iraqi Freedom Veteran License Plates – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any honorably discharged or
present member of the United States Armed Forces who served in
Operation Iraqi Freedom. Such person may apply for an Operation
Iraqi Freedom Veteran license plate for each vehicle with a rated
carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less, or for a motorcycle;
provided, the license plate for motorcycles may be of similar design
to the license plate for motor vehicles or may be a new design in
order to meet space requirements for a motorcycle license plate;
41. United States Air Force Academy Alumni License Plates -
such plates shall be designed and issued to any resident of this
state who is an alumnus of the United States Air Force Academy.
Such persons may apply for a United States Air Force Academy Alumnus
license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one
(1) ton or less;
HB1598 HFLR Page 22
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

42. Operation Enduring Freedom Veteran License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any honorably discharged or
present member of the United States Armed Forces who served in
Operation Enduring Freedom on or after September 11, 2001. The
license plate shall be designed in consultation with the Military
Department of the State of Oklahoma. Such person may apply for an
Operation Enduring Freedom Veteran license plate for each vehicle
with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less, or for a
motorcycle; provided, the license plate for motorcycles may be of
similar design to the license plate for motor vehicles or may be a
new design in order to meet space requirements for a motorcycle
license plate;
43. Military Multi-Decoration License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any honorably discharged or present member
of the United States Armed Forces who qualifies for more than one
military decoration license plate pursuant to the provisions of this
section. Service Oklahoma shall develop and implement a system
whereby the designs of the eligible license plates can be included
together on a single license plate. Such person may apply for a
Military Multi-Decoration license plate for each vehicle with a
rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less;
44. Global War on Terror Expeditionary License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any honorably discharged or
present member of the United States Armed Forces who has earned a
HB1598 HFLR Page 23
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Glob al War on Terror Expeditionary decoration. The license plate
shall be designed in consultation with the United States Institute
of Heraldry and the Military Department of the State of Oklahoma.
Such person may apply for a Global War on Terror Expeditionary
license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one
(1) ton or less;
45. Legion of Merit Medal Recipient License Plates - such
plates shall be designed for any resident of this state presenting
proper certification from the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs or the Armed Forces of the United States certifying that
such resident has been awarded the Legion of Merit military
decoration. Such persons may apply for a Legion of Merit recipient
license plate for vehicles having a rated carrying capacity of one
(1) ton or less. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with the Military Department of the State of Oklahoma;
46. 1-179th License Plates - such plates shall be designed for
members, prior members and members of the household of a member or
former member of the 1-179th Infantry. Persons applying for such
license plate must obtain and provide proof of their membership
association with the 1-179th Infantry Association. The license
plate shall be designed in consultation with the 1-179th Infantry;
47. 2-179th License Plates - such plates shall be designed for
members, prior members and members of the household of a member or
former member of the 2-179th Infantry. Persons applying for such
HB1598 HFLR Page 24
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

lice nse plate must obtain and provide proof of their membership
association with the 2-179th Infantry Association. The license
plate shall be designed in consultation with the 2-179th Infantry;
48. Combat Action Ribbon Recipient License Plates - such plates
shall be designed to honor recipients of the Combat Action Ribbon
who present proper certification from the United States Department
of the Navy. The license plate shall include the Combat Action
Ribbon earned by the recipient. Such persons may apply for a Combat
Action Ribbon Recipient license plate for vehicles having a rated
carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less;
49. Oklahoma Submarine Veterans License Plate – such plates
shall be designed for any resident of this state who is a United
States submarine veteran and presents either a Department of Defense
form 214 or other documentation certifying such service. Such
persons may apply for an Oklahoma Submarine Veterans license plate
for vehicles having a rated capacity of one (1) ton or less. The
license plate design shall include both gold and silver dolphins to
represent both officer and enlisted service members;
50. United States Navy Seabees and Civil Engineer Corps License
Plate – such plates shall be designed and issued to any honorably
discharged or present member of the United States Navy Seabees or
Civil Engineer Corps. Such persons may apply for a United States
Navy Seabees and Civil Engineer Corps license plate for vehicles
having a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less. The
HB1598 HFLR Page 25
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

lice nse plate shall be designed in consultation with the Military
Department of the State of Oklahoma;
51. Combat Action Badge Recipient License Plate - such plates
shall be designed to honor recipients of the Combat Action Badge who
present proper certification from the United States Army. The
license plate shall include the Combat Action Badge earned by the
recipient. Such persons may apply for a Combat Action Badge
Recipient license plate for vehicles having a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less, or for a motorcycle; provided, the
license plate for motorcycles may be of similar design to the
license plate for motor vehicles or may be a new design in order to
meet space requirements for a motorcycle license plate;
52. Iraq Combat Veteran License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any honorably discharged or present member of
the United States Armed Forces who saw combat in Operation Iraqi
Freedom. Such persons may apply for an Iraq Combat Veteran license
plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton
or less, or for a motorcycle; provided, the license plate for
motorcycles may be of similar design to the license plate for motor
vehicles or may be a new design in order to meet space requirements
for a motorcycle license plate;
53. Afghanistan Combat Veteran License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any honorably discharged or present
member of the United States Armed Forces who saw combat in Operation
HB1598 HFLR Page 26
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Endu ring Freedom. Such persons may apply for an Afghanistan Combat
Veteran license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less, or for a motorcycle; provided, the
license plate for motorcycles may be of similar design to the
license plate for motor vehicles or may be a new design in order to
meet space requirements for a motorcycle license plate;
54. Special Forces Association License Plates – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any honorably discharged or present
member of the Army Special Forces qualified and authorized to wear
upon the person's United States military uniform the Army Special
Forces Tab. Persons applying for the Special Forces Association
license plate must provide a copy of the orders awarding the Special
Forces Tab or authorizing its wear upon a United States military
uniform. The license plate shall be designed in consultation with
the Special Forces Association, Chapter 32-50. Service Oklahoma
shall produce up to two distinct designs for the Special Forces
Association license plate. Qualified persons may select one design
at the time of application. The plates shall be issued to any
qualified person in any combination of numbers and letters from one
to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates;
55. Veterans of the United States Armed Forces License Plates –
such plates shall be designed for veterans of the United States
Armed Forces, and shall identify the branch of service, carry the
emblem and name of either the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marines or
HB1598 HFLR Page 27
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Coas t Guard, according to the branch of service to which the member
belonged, and shall reflect veteran status. Former members who have
been dishonorably discharged shall not be eligible for such plates.
Persons applying for such license plates must show proof of past
military service by presenting a valid United States Department of
Defense Form (DD)214 upon initial application but shall not be
required to provide proof of eligibility annually;
56. Navy Chief License Plates - such plates shall be designed
and issued to any resident of this state who has achieved the rank
of E7 through E9 in the United States Navy and presents proper
certification that the resident has achieved such rank and was
either honorably discharged or is an active or retired member of the
United States Navy. Such persons may apply for a Navy Chief license
plate for vehicles having a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton
or less, or for a motorcycle; provided, the license plate for
motorcycles may be of similar design to the license plate for motor
vehicles or may be a new design in order to meet space requirements
for a motorcycle license plate;
57. Air Medal License Plate – such plates shall be designed and
issued to any resident of this state who has earned the Air Medal
and presents proper certification that the resident has been awarded
such medal. The license plate shall include an image of the Air
Medal earned by the recipient. Such persons may apply for an Air
Medal license plate for vehicles having a rated carrying capacity of
HB1598 HFLR Page 28
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

one (1) ton or less, or for a motorcycle; provided, the license
plate for motorcycles may be of similar design to the license plate
for motor vehicles or may be a new design in order to meet space
requirements for a motorcycle license plate;
58. a. U.S. Army Ranger License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any resident of this state who
is an active, retired, or honorably discharged member
of a U.S. Army Ranger unit, or who is a graduate of
the U.S. Army Ranger School. Persons applying for the
U.S. Army Ranger License Plate shall provide military
orders or official documentation proving the
applicant's eligibility, including:
(1) military orders detailing a past or current
assignment to a U.S. Army Ranger unit,
(2) military orders awarding the Ranger Tab
authorized by the U.S. Army,
(3) certificate of release or discharge from active
duty, DD Form 214, or report of separation and
record of service, NGB form 22, indicating the
awarding of the Ranger Tab, or
(4) diploma issued to the applicant from the U.S.
Army Ranger School.
b. In addition to the documentation listed above, an
active military member shall present a valid military
HB1598 HFLR Page 29
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

identification card or a document that shows
sufficient proof that the applicant is an active
member of the military. A retired or honorably
discharged member of the military shall present:
(1) a certified copy of the member's release or
discharge from active duty, DD Form 214,
honorable discharge certificate, United States
Department of Defense Form 256, or report of
separation and record of service, NGB form 22,
which has an honorable discharge
characterization, or
(2) a valid form DD2 (retired) military
identification card. Such persons may apply for
a U.S. Army Ranger License Plate for vehicles
having a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton
or less, or for a motorcycle; provided, the
license plate for motorcycles may be of similar
design to the license plate for motor vehicles or
may be a new design in order to meet space
requirements for a motorcycle license plate. The
license plate shall be designed in consultation
with the Military Department of the State of
Oklahoma;

HB1598 HFLR Page 30
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

59. 45th Infantry Brigade Combat Team License Plate - such
plates shall be designed for members, former members, and members of
the household of a member or former member of the 45th Infantry
Brigade Combat Team. Persons applying for such license plate shall
obtain and provide suitable proof of their membership association
with the 45th Infantry Brigade Combat Team. Such persons may apply
for a 45th Infantry Brigade Combat Team License Plate for vehicles
having a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less, or for a
motorcycle; provided, the license plate for motorcycles may be of
similar design to the license plate for motor vehicles or may be a
new design in order to meet space requirements for a motorcycle
license plate. The license plate shall be designed in consultation
with the Military Department of the State of Oklahoma; and
60. Meritorious Service Medal License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any resident of this state who has earned
the Meritorious Service Medal and presents proper certification that
the resident has been awarded such medal. The license plate shall
include an image of the Meritorious Service Medal earned by the
recipient. Such persons may apply for a Meritorious Service Medal
license plate for vehicles having a rated carrying capacity of one
(1) ton or less, or for a motorcycle; provided, the license plate
for motorcycles may be of similar design to the license plate for
motor vehicles or may be a new design in order to meet space
requirements for a motorcycle license plate.
HB1598 HFLR Page 31
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

C. Unless otherwise provided by this section, the fee for such
plates shall be Eight Dollars ($8.00) and shall be in addition to
all other registration fees provided by the Oklahoma Vehicle License
and Registration Act. Such fees shall be deposited in the Oklahoma
Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund to be used for the administration
of the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act. Beginning
January 1, 2023, such fees shall be deposited in the Service
Oklahoma Reimbursement Fund to be used for the administration of the
Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 02/13/2025 - DO PASS.












HB1598 HFLR Page 32
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.